Hawaii statutes.
§321-11.5 Establishment of fees. (a)
The department of health, by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91, may
establish reasonable fees for the issuance or renewal of licenses, permits,
variances, and various certificates required by law or by the department's
rules. The fees may include the cost of related examinations, inspections,
investigations, and reviews.

(b) [Repeal and reenactment on June 30,
2014. L Sp 2009, c 21, §8.] All fees paid and collected pursuant to this
section and rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91 from facilities seeking
licensure or certification by the department of health, including hospitals,
nursing homes, home health agencies, home care agencies, intermediate care
facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities, freestanding
outpatient surgical facilities, adult day health care centers, rural health
centers, laboratories, adult residential care homes, expanded adult residential
care homes, developmental disability domiciliary homes, assisted living facilities,
therapeutic living programs, and special treatment facilities, shall be
deposited into the office of health care assurance special fund created under
section 321-1.4. Any other entities required by law to be licensed by the
department of health shall also be subject to reasonable fees established by
the department of health by rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91.

(c) Other than the fees collected under
subsection (b), all other fees collected under this section and section 321-15
shall be deposited into the sanitation and environmental health special fund
established under section 321-27. [L 1982, c 80, §4; am L 1994, c 169, §§3, 9;
am L 1996, c 164, §1; am L 1998, c 311, §§13, 16; am L 1999, c 120, §3; am L
2007, c 90, §2; am L Sp 2009, c 21, §4; am L 2010, c 176, §2; am L 2011, c 220,
§11]

Note

Repeal and reenactment of subsection (b) on June 30, 2019.
L Sp 2009, c 21, §8; L 2014, c 125, §2.

The 2011 amendment is exempt from the repeal and reenactment
condition of L Sp 2009, c 21. L 2011, c 220, §20.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next